Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. RECORDS

SUBTITLE C. RECORDS PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 203. MANAGEMENT AND PRESERVATION OF RECORDS

SUBCHAPTER A. ELECTIVE COUNTY OFFICES

Sec. 203.001. RECORDS MANAGEMENT OFFICER. Each elected county officer is the records management officer for the records of the officer's office.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.002. DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF ELECTED COUNTY OFFICERS AS RECORDS MANAGEMENT OFFICERS. The elected county officer shall:

(1) develop policies and procedures for the administration of an active and continuing records management program;

(2) administer the records management program so as to reduce the costs and improve the efficiency of recordkeeping;

(3) identify and take adequate steps to preserve records that are of permanent value;

(4) identify and take adequate steps to protect the essential records of the office;

(5) ensure that the maintenance, preservation, microfilming, destruction, or other disposition of records is carried out in accordance with the policies and procedures of the records management program and the requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it; and

(6) cooperate with the commission in its conduct of statewide records management surveys.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 203.003. DUTIES OF COMMISSIONERS COURT. The commissioners court of each county shall:

(1) promote and support the efficient and economical management of records of all elective offices in the county to enable elected county officers to conform to this subtitle and rules adopted under it;

(2) facilitate the creation and maintenance of records containing adequate and proper documentation of the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential transactions of each elective office and designed to furnish the information necessary to protect the legal and financial rights of the local government, the state, and the persons affected by the activities of the local government;

(3) facilitate the identification and preservation of the records of elective offices that are of permanent value;

(4) facilitate the identification and protection of the essential records of elective offices;

(5) establish a county clerk records management and preservation fund for fees subject to Section 118.0216 and approve in advance any expenditures from the fund; and

(6) establish a records management and preservation account for the records management and preservation fees authorized under Sections 135.101 and 135.102, and approve in advance any expenditures from the fund, which may be spent only for records management preservation or automation purposes in the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 675, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 4.36, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 3.12, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 203.004. DIRECTOR AND LIBRARIAN. The director and librarian shall provide advice and assistance to records management officers in establishing records management programs and in carrying out the other requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.005. RECORDS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM TO BE ESTABLISHED. (a) On or before January 1, 1991, each elected county officer shall adopt a written plan establishing an active and continuing program for the efficient and economical management of the records of the elective office of which the elected officer is custodian.

(b) The plan must provide policies, methods, and procedures to fulfill the duties and responsibilities set out in Section 203.002 concerning the management and preservation of records. The plan may establish additional policies or procedures for the operation of the records management program that are consistent with the requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it.

(c) A copy of the plan must be filed by the elected county officer with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of its adoption.

(d) A plan establishing or relating to a records management program adopted before September 1, 1989, must be amended if any provision of the plan is in conflict with this subtitle or a rule adopted under it. A copy of the amended plan shall be filed with the director and librarian as provided by Subsection (c).

(e) A copy of an amended plan relating to the establishment or operation of the records management plan must be filed with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of its adoption.

(f) The director and librarian or the designee of the director and librarian shall within a reasonable time bring to the attention of the elected county officer in writing any aspect of a plan filed in the office of the director and librarian or that otherwise comes to the attention of the director and librarian that is inconsistent with requirements of this subtitle or rules adopted under it.

(g) An elected county officer is authorized, instead of or in conjunction with submitting a plan and establishing an independent records program for the elective office, to participate in a county program established as provided by Subchapter B or in one or more specific components of a county program and to authorize the records management officer of the county program to act as the records management officer for the records of the elective office.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. ALL OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICES

Sec. 203.021. DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF GOVERNING BODY. The governing body of a local government, including a commissioners court with regard to nonelective county offices, shall:

(1) establish, promote, and support an active and continuing program for the efficient and economical management of all local government records;

(2) cause policies and procedures to be developed for the administration of the program under the direction of the records management officer;

(3) facilitate the creation and maintenance of local government records containing adequate and proper documentation of the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential transactions of the local government and designed to furnish the information necessary to protect the legal and financial rights of the local government, the state, and persons affected by the activities of the local government;

(4) facilitate the identification and preservation of local government records that are of permanent value;

(5) facilitate the identification and protection of essential local government records; and

(6) cooperate with the commission in its conduct of statewide records management surveys.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.022. DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF CUSTODIANS. (a) Custodians of records in each local government shall:

(1) cooperate with the records management officer in carrying out the policies and procedures established by the local government for the efficient and economical management of records and in carrying out the requirements of this subtitle;

(2) adequately document the transaction of government business and the services, programs, and duties for which the custodian and the custodian's staff are responsible; and

(3) maintain the records in the custodian's care and carry out their preservation, microfilming, destruction, or other disposition only in accordance with the policies and procedures of the local government's records management program and the requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it.

(b) State law relating to the duties, other responsibilities, or recordkeeping requirements of a custodian of local government records do not exempt the custodian or the records in the custodian's care from the application of this subtitle and rules adopted under it and may not be used by the custodian as a basis for refusal to participate in the records management program of the local government whose establishment is required by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.023. DUTIES OF RECORDS MANAGEMENT OFFICER. The records management officer in each local government shall:

(1) assist in establishing and developing policies and procedures for a records management program for the local government;

(2) administer the records management program and provide assistance to custodians for the purposes of reducing the costs and improving the efficiency of recordkeeping;

(3) in cooperation with the custodians of the records, prepare the records control schedules and amended schedules required by Section 203.041 and the list of obsolete records as provided by Section 203.044;

(4) in cooperation with custodians, identify and take adequate steps to preserve local government records that are of permanent value;

(5) in cooperation with custodians, identify and take adequate steps to protect essential local government records;

(6) in cooperation with custodians, ensure that the maintenance, preservation, microfilming, destruction, or other disposition of records is carried out in accordance with the policies and procedures of the local government's records management program and the requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it;

(7) disseminate to the governing body and custodians information concerning state laws, administrative rules, and the policies of the government relating to local government records; and

(8) in cooperation with custodians, establish procedures to ensure that the handling of records in any context of the records management program by the records management officer or those under the officer's authority is carried out with due regard for:

(A) the duties and responsibilities of custodians that may be imposed by law; and

(B) the confidentiality of information in records to which access is restricted by law.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 203.024. DIRECTOR AND LIBRARIAN. The director and librarian shall provide advice and assistance to governing bodies, custodians, and records management officers in establishing records management programs and in carrying out the other requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.025. DESIGNATION OF RECORDS MANAGEMENT OFFICER. (a) On or before June 1, 1990, the governing body of each local government shall designate a records management officer by:

(1) designating an individual; or

(2) designating an office or position, the holder of which shall be the records management officer.

(b) The name, office, or position of the records management officer shall be entered on the minutes of the governing body.

(c) The name or the name and office or position of the records management officer shall be filed by the records management officer with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of the designation.

(d) The designation of a new individual or a new office or position shall be entered on the minutes and reported by the records management officer to the director and librarian in the same manner as the original designation.

(e) If the order designating a records management officer designates an office or position rather than an individual, a new holder of that office or position must file the holder's name with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of assuming the office or position.

(f) Through an agreement or contract under The Interlocal Cooperation Act (Article 4413(32c), Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), a person may serve as records management officer to more than one local government if the person is employed by one of the local governments that is party to the contract or agreement or employed by an administrative agency that is created by the contract or agreement.

(g) An elected county officer may not be designated as records management officer for the nonelective offices of a county without the county officer's consent.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.026. RECORDS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM TO BE ESTABLISHED. (a) On or before January 1, 1991, each governing body by ordinance or order, as appropriate, shall establish a records management program to be administered by the records management officer.

(b) The ordinance or order must provide methods and procedures to enable the governing body, custodians, and the records management officer to fulfill the duties and responsibilities set out in Sections 203.021, 203.022, and 203.023 concerning the management and preservation of records. The ordinance or order may prescribe any policies or procedures for the operation of the records management program that are consistent with the requirements of this subtitle and rules adopted under it.

(c) A copy of the ordinance or order must be filed by the records management officer with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of its adoption.

(d) An ordinance or order establishing or relating to a records management program adopted before September 1, 1989, must be amended if any provision of the ordinance or order is in conflict with this subtitle or a rule adopted under it. A copy of the amended ordinance or order shall be filed with the director and librarian as provided by Subsection (c).

(e) A copy of an amended ordinance or revised order relating to the establishment or operation of the records management program must be filed by the governing body with the director and librarian within 30 days after the date of its adoption.

(f) The director and librarian or the designee of the director and librarian shall within a reasonable time bring to the attention of the governing body in writing any aspect of an ordinance or order filed in the office of the director and librarian or that otherwise comes to the attention of the director and librarian that is inconsistent with the requirements of this subtitle or rules adopted under it.

(g) The governing body in a records management program established under this section may require the mandatory destruction of any record of the local government when its retention period has expired on a records control schedule developed under Section 203.041.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER C. RECORDS CONTROL SCHEDULES

Sec. 203.041. PREPARATION OF RECORDS CONTROL SCHEDULES. (a) On or before January 4, 1999, the records management officer shall:

(1) prepare a records control schedule listing the following records and establishing a retention period for each as provided by Section 203.042:

(A) all records created or received by the local government or elective county office;

(B) any record no longer created or received by the local government or elective county office that is still in its possession and for which the retention period on a records retention schedule issued by the commission has not expired; and

(C) any record no longer created or received by the local government or elective county office that is still in its possession and for which the retention period on a records retention schedule issued by the commission has expired but which will not be destroyed as provided by Section 203.044; and

(2) file with the director and librarian a written certification of compliance that the local government or the elective county office has adopted records control schedules that comply with the minimum requirements established on records retention schedules issued by the commission.

(b) At the discretion of the records management officer the records control schedule may also list and provide retention periods for material that is excluded from the definition of a local government record by Section 201.003(8) and exempted records described by Section 202.001(b) if in the officer's opinion the inclusion of the material or records is necessary to ensure the periodic destruction of the material or records in the interest of efficient records management.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) The records management officer shall review the records control schedules of the local government or elective county office and prepare amendments to the schedules as needed to reflect new records created or received by the government or office or revisions to retention periods established in a records retention schedule issued by the commission. The records management officer shall file with the director and librarian a written certification of compliance that the local government or the elective county office has amended the records control schedules to comply with the minimum requirements established on records retention schedules issued by the commission.

(e) The governing body shall require in the ordinance or order establishing the records management program the review or approval of a records control schedule or amended schedule by the officers of the local government as it considers necessary. The records control schedule or amended schedule for an elective county office need only be approved by the elected official in charge of that office.

(f) Records control schedules may be prepared on an office-by-office basis or on a department-by-department basis within each office.

(g) A local government that intends to retain all records permanently or that destroys only those records for which no retention periods have been established in a records retention schedule established under Section 441.158, Government Code, is not required to prepare a records control schedule under this section.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 86, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 203.042. RETENTION PERIODS. (a) A retention period for each record on the records control schedule shall be determined by the governing body or under its direction or by the elected county officer, as applicable.

(b) A retention period may not be less than:

(1) a retention period prescribed by a state or federal law, regulation, or rule of court; or

(2) a retention period for the record established on a records retention schedule issued by the commission.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 203.044. INITIAL DESTRUCTION OF OBSOLETE RECORDS. (a) In preparing a records control schedule required by Section 203.041, the records management officer may list separately those obsolete records no longer created or received by the local government or elective county office whose retention periods on a records retention schedule issued by the commission have expired and that the local government or elected county officer wishes to destroy.

(b) The lists of obsolete records to be destroyed must be reviewed or approved in the same manner as records control schedules must be reviewed or approved under Section 203.041(e).

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 20(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 203.046. RECORDKEEPING REQUIREMENTS. As the governing body may require, the records management officer shall keep accurate lists of records destroyed, their volume, and other information of records management activities.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.047. NEW LOCAL GOVERNMENTS. A local government established after September 1, 1989, shall fulfill the requirements of Sections 203.025, 203.026, and 203.041 within one year after the date of its establishment.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.048. CARE OF RECORDS OF PERMANENT VALUE. The commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the proper care and storage of local government records of permanent value. The commission may require that certain local government records of permanent value be created on permanent-durable paper, the standards for which shall be established by rule. The rules must be approved as required by Section 441.165, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.049. TRANSFER OF RECORDS OF PERMANENT VALUE. (a) The governing body or elected county officer may offer to transfer records of permanent value not needed in the day-to-day business of the local government to the custody of:

(1) the commission; or

(2) another local government that operates an archives, library, or museum that meets standards for the care and storage of permanent records established by the commission as provided by Section 203.048.

(b) Transfers of permanent records to another local government require the prior approval of the director and librarian.

(c) In a transfer of permanent records under this section, title and control of the records and all rights pertaining to the records granted by law to the original custodian or elected county officer are vested in the commission or the local government that receives the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 203.050. INSPECTION OF PERMANENT RECORDS. (a) The director and librarian or the authorized representative of the director and librarian is entitled to inspect in the offices of any local government or elected county officer the condition of any permanent record to which access by the director and librarian or the representative is not restricted by law. The inspection is not a release of a record to a member of the public under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(b) The director and librarian, in writing, shall bring to the attention of the governing body or elected county officer, any aspect of the storage, handling, or use of the record that imperils its survival and state what measures must be taken to properly care for and preserve the record.

(c) If, after having been notified by the director and librarian as provided by Subsection (b), the governing body or the elected county officer fails to take required measures to preserve the record, the director and librarian may:

(1) if the record is an obsolete record whose creation is no longer required by law, demand and receive delivery of the record to the custody of the commission; or

(2) if the record is required for current use by the local government, make copies of the record for the purpose of preservation by the commission.

(d) The cost of transferring or copying records under this section shall be paid for out of funds of the commission.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(90), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER D. RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED TO COMPTROLLER

Sec. 203.061. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a special purpose district described by Section 403.0241(b), Government Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 564 (S.B. 625), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 203.062. PROVISION OF CERTAIN RECORDS AND OTHER INFORMATION TO COMPTROLLER. (a) A special purpose district shall transmit records and other information to the comptroller annually for purposes of providing the comptroller with information to operate and update the Special Purpose District Public Information Database under Section 403.0241, Government Code.

(b) The special purpose district may comply with Subsection (a) by affirming that records and other information previously transmitted are current.

(c) The special purpose district shall transmit the records and other information in a form and in the manner prescribed by the comptroller.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 564 (S.B. 625), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 203.063. PENALTIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE. (a) If a special purpose district does not timely comply with Section 203.062, the comptroller shall provide written notice to the special purpose district:

(1) informing the special purpose district of the violation of that section; and

(2) notifying the special purpose district that the special purpose district will be subject to a penalty of $1,000 if the special purpose district does not report the required information on or before the 30th day after the date the notice is provided.

(b) Not later than the 30th day after the date the comptroller provides notice to a special purpose district under Subsection (a), the special purpose district must report the required information.

(c) If a special purpose district does not report the required information as prescribed by Subsection (b):

(1) the special purpose district is liable to the state for a civil penalty of $1,000; and

(2) the comptroller shall provide written notice to the special purpose district:

(A) informing the special purpose district of the liability for the penalty; and

(B) notifying the special purpose district that if the special purpose district does not report the required information on or before the 30th day after the date the notice is provided:

(i) the special purpose district will be subject to an additional penalty of $1,000; and

(ii) the noncompliance will be reflected in the list maintained by the comptroller under Section 403.0242, Government Code.

(d) Not later than the 30th day after the date the comptroller provides notice to a special purpose district under Subsection (c), the special purpose district must report the required information.

(e) If a special purpose district does not report the required information as prescribed by Subsection (d):

(1) the special purpose district is liable to the state for a civil penalty of $1,000; and

(2) the comptroller shall:

(A) reflect the noncompliance in the list maintained under Section 403.0242, Government Code, until the special purpose district reports all information required under Section 203.062; and

(B) provide written notice to the special purpose district that the noncompliance will be reflected in the list until the special purpose district reports the required information.

(f) The attorney general may sue to collect a civil penalty imposed by this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 564 (S.B. 625), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.